District of Columbia statutes.
20-902

Effect of statute of limitations.

Unless a contrary intent is expressly indicated in the will, no claim which was barred by any statute of limitations at the time of the decedent’s death shall be allowed or paid. In an action against the estate of a deceased person, the interval between the death of the deceased and 6 months after the date of the first publication of notice of the appointment of a personal representative (not to exceed 2 years) shall not be computed as a part of the period within which the action must be brought.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-902.